Illinois, session 104th, SB3628.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended by 5changing Sections 2a and 2b as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 120/2a)  (from Ch. 120, par. 441a)7    Sec. 2a. Registration of retailers. It is unlawful for any 8person to engage in the business of selling, which, on and 9after January 1, 2025, includes leasing, tangible personal 10property at retail in this State without a certificate of 11registration from the Department. Application for a 12certificate of registration shall be made to the Department 13upon forms furnished by it. Each such application shall be 14signed and verified and shall state: (1) the name and social 15security number of the applicant; (2) the address of his 16principal place of business; (3) the address of the principal 17place of business from which he engages in the business of 18selling tangible personal property at retail in this State and 19the addresses of all other places of business, if any 20(enumerating such addresses, if any, in a separate list 21attached to and made a part of the application), from which he 22engages in the business of selling tangible personal property 23at retail in this State; (4) the name and address of the person   SB3628- 2 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1or persons who will be responsible for filing returns and 2payment of taxes due under this Act; (5) in the case of a 3publicly traded corporation, the name and title of the Chief 4Financial Officer, Chief Operating Officer, and any other 5officer or employee with responsibility for preparing tax 6returns under this Act, and, in the case of all other 7corporations, the name, title, and social security number of 8each corporate officer; (6) in the case of a limited liability 9company, the name, social security number, and FEIN number of 10each manager and member; and (7) such other information as the 11Department may reasonably require. The application shall 12contain an acceptance of responsibility signed by the person 13or persons who will be responsible for filing returns and 14payment of the taxes due under this Act. If the applicant will 15sell tangible personal property at retail through vending 16machines, his application to register shall indicate the 17number of vending machines to be so operated. If requested by 18the Department at any time, that person shall verify the total 19number of vending machines he or she uses in his or her 20business of selling tangible personal property at retail.21    The Department shall provide by rule for an expedited 22business registration process for remote retailers required to 23register and file under subsection (b) of Section 2 who use a 24certified service provider to file their returns under this 25Act. Such expedited registration process shall allow the 26Department to register a taxpayer based upon the same   SB3628- 3 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1registration information required by the Streamlined Sales Tax 2Governing Board for states participating in the Streamlined 3Sales Tax Project. 4    The Department may deny a certificate of registration to 5any applicant if a person who is named as the owner, a partner, 6a manager or member of a limited liability company, or a 7corporate officer of the applicant on the application for the 8certificate of registration is or has been named as the owner, 9a partner, a manager or member of a limited liability company, 10or a corporate officer on the application for the certificate 11of registration of another retailer that (i) is in default for 12moneys due under this Act or any other tax or fee Act 13administered by the Department or (ii) fails to file any 14return, on or before the due date prescribed for filing that 15return (including any extensions of time granted by the 16Department), that the retailer is required to file under this 17Act or any other tax or fee Act administered by the Department. 18For purposes of this paragraph only, in determining whether a 19person is in default for moneys due, the Department shall 20include only amounts established as a final liability within 21the 23 years prior to the date of the Department's notice of 22denial of a certificate of registration. 23    The Department may require an applicant for a certificate 24of registration hereunder to, at the time of filing such 25application, furnish a bond from a surety company authorized 26to do business in the State of Illinois, or an irrevocable bank   SB3628- 4 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1letter of credit or a bond signed by 2 personal sureties who 2have filed, with the Department, sworn statements disclosing 3net assets equal to at least 3 times the amount of the bond to 4be required of such applicant, or a bond secured by an 5assignment of a bank account or certificate of deposit, stocks 6or bonds, conditioned upon the applicant paying to the State 7of Illinois all moneys becoming due under this Act and under 8any other State tax law or municipal or county tax ordinance or 9resolution under which the certificate of registration that is 10issued to the applicant under this Act will permit the 11applicant to engage in business without registering separately 12under such other law, ordinance or resolution. In making a 13determination as to whether to require a bond or other 14security, the Department shall take into consideration whether 15the owner, any partner, any manager or member of a limited 16liability company, or a corporate officer of the applicant is 17or has been the owner, a partner, a manager or member of a 18limited liability company, or a corporate officer of another 19retailer that is in default for moneys due under this Act or 20any other tax or fee Act administered by the Department; and 21whether the owner, any partner, any manager or member of a 22limited liability company, or a corporate officer of the 23applicant is or has been the owner, a partner, a manager or 24member of a limited liability company, or a corporate officer 25of another retailer whose certificate of registration has been 26revoked within the previous 5 years under this Act or any other   SB3628- 5 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1tax or fee Act administered by the Department. If a bond or 2other security is required, the Department shall fix the 3amount of the bond or other security, taking into 4consideration the amount of money expected to become due from 5the applicant under this Act and under any other State tax law 6or municipal or county tax ordinance or resolution under which 7the certificate of registration that is issued to the 8applicant under this Act will permit the applicant to engage 9in business without registering separately under such other 10law, ordinance, or resolution. The amount of security required 11by the Department shall be such as, in its opinion, will 12protect the State of Illinois against failure to pay the 13amount which may become due from the applicant under this Act 14and under any other State tax law or municipal or county tax 15ordinance or resolution under which the certificate of 16registration that is issued to the applicant under this Act 17will permit the applicant to engage in business without 18registering separately under such other law, ordinance or 19resolution, but the amount of the security required by the 20Department shall not exceed three times the amount of the 21applicant's average monthly tax liability, or $50,000.00, 22whichever amount is lower.23    No certificate of registration under this Act shall be 24issued by the Department until the applicant provides the 25Department with satisfactory security, if required, as herein 26provided for.  SB3628- 6 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1    Upon receipt of the application for certificate of 2registration in proper form, and upon approval by the 3Department of the security furnished by the applicant, if 4required, the Department shall issue to such applicant, in the 5manner and form determined by the Department, a certificate of 6registration which shall permit the person to whom it is 7issued to engage in the business of selling tangible personal 8property at retail in this State. The certificate of 9registration shall be conspicuously displayed, in the manner 10and form as the Department may require by rule, at the place of 11business which the person so registered states in his 12application to be the principal place of business from which 13he engages in the business of selling tangible personal 14property at retail in this State.15    No certificate of registration issued prior to July 1, 162017 to a taxpayer who files returns required by this Act on a 17monthly basis or renewed prior to July 1, 2017 by a taxpayer 18who files returns required by this Act on a monthly basis shall 19be valid after the expiration of 5 years from the date of its 20issuance or last renewal. No certificate of registration 21issued on or after July 1, 2017 to a taxpayer who files returns 22required by this Act on a monthly basis or renewed on or after 23July 1, 2017 by a taxpayer who files returns required by this 24Act on a monthly basis shall be valid after the expiration of 25one year from the date of its issuance or last renewal. The 26expiration date of a sub-certificate of registration shall be   SB3628- 7 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1that of the certificate of registration to which the 2sub-certificate relates. Prior to July 1, 2017, a certificate 3of registration shall automatically be renewed, subject to 4revocation as provided by this Act, for an additional 5 years 5from the date of its expiration unless otherwise notified by 6the Department as provided by this paragraph. On and after 7July 1, 2017, a certificate of registration shall 8automatically be renewed, subject to revocation as provided by 9this Act, for an additional one year from the date of its 10expiration unless otherwise notified by the Department as 11provided by this paragraph. 12    Where a taxpayer to whom a certificate of registration is 13issued under this Act is in default to the State of Illinois 14for delinquent returns or for moneys due under this Act or any 15other State tax law or municipal or county ordinance 16administered or enforced by the Department, the Department 17shall, not less than 60 days before the expiration date of such 18certificate of registration, give notice to the taxpayer to 19whom the certificate was issued of the account period of the 20delinquent returns, the amount of tax, penalty and interest 21due and owing from the taxpayer, and that the certificate of 22registration shall not be automatically renewed upon its 23expiration date unless the taxpayer, on or before the date of 24expiration, has filed and paid the delinquent returns or paid 25the defaulted amount in full. A taxpayer to whom such a notice 26is issued shall be deemed an applicant for renewal. The   SB3628- 8 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1Department shall promulgate regulations establishing 2procedures for taxpayers who file returns on a monthly basis 3but desire and qualify to change to a quarterly or yearly 4filing basis and will no longer be subject to renewal under 5this Section, and for taxpayers who file returns on a yearly or 6quarterly basis but who desire or are required to change to a 7monthly filing basis and will be subject to renewal under this 8Section.9    The Department may in its discretion approve renewal by an 10applicant who is in default if, at the time of application for 11renewal, the applicant files all of the delinquent returns or 12pays to the Department such percentage of the defaulted amount 13as may be determined by the Department and agrees in writing to 14waive all limitations upon the Department for collection of 15the remaining defaulted amount to the Department over a period 16not to exceed 5 years from the date of renewal of the 17certificate; however, no renewal application submitted by an 18applicant who is in default shall be approved if the 19immediately preceding renewal by the applicant was conditioned 20upon the installment payment agreement described in this 21Section. The payment agreement herein provided for shall be in 22addition to and not in lieu of the security that may be 23required by this Section of a taxpayer who is no longer 24considered a prior continuous compliance taxpayer. The 25execution of the payment agreement as provided in this Act 26shall not toll the accrual of interest at the statutory rate.  SB3628- 9 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1    The Department may suspend a certificate of registration 2if the Department finds that the person to whom the 3certificate of registration has been issued knowingly sold 4contraband cigarettes. 5    A certificate of registration issued under this Act more 6than 5 years before January 1, 1990 (the effective date of 7Public Act 86-383) shall expire and be subject to the renewal 8provisions of this Section on the next anniversary of the date 9of issuance of such certificate which occurs more than 6 10months after January 1, 1990 (the effective date of Public Act 1186-383). A certificate of registration issued less than 5 12years before January 1, 1990 (the effective date of Public Act 1386-383) shall expire and be subject to the renewal provisions 14of this Section on the 5th anniversary of the issuance of the 15certificate.16    If a person who is licensed as a retailer of alcoholic 17liquor under the Liquor Control Act of 1934 has had the renewal 18of his or her certificate of registration denied under this 19Section 2a, then, pursuant to Section 7-6.5 of the Liquor 20Control Act of 1934, the Department shall file a notice with 21the Liquor Control Commission that includes a certification, 22signed by the Director of Revenue or his or her designee, 23attesting that the person's certificate of registration 24renewal has been denied after notice and an opportunity to be 25heard. 26    If the person so registered states that he operates other   SB3628- 10 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1places of business from which he engages in the business of 2selling tangible personal property at retail in this State, 3the Department shall furnish him with a sub-certificate of 4registration for each such place of business, and the 5applicant shall display the appropriate sub-certificate of 6registration at each such place of business. All 7sub-certificates of registration shall bear the same 8registration number as that appearing upon the certificate of 9registration to which such sub-certificates relate.10    If the applicant will sell tangible personal property at 11retail through vending machines, the Department shall furnish 12him with a sub-certificate of registration for each such 13vending machine, and the applicant shall display the 14appropriate sub-certificate of registration on each such 15vending machine by attaching the sub-certificate of 16registration to a conspicuous part of such vending machine. If 17a person who is registered to sell tangible personal property 18at retail through vending machines adds an additional vending 19machine or additional vending machines to the number of 20vending machines he or she uses in his or her business of 21selling tangible personal property at retail, he or she shall 22notify the Department, on a form prescribed by the Department, 23to request an additional sub-certificate or additional 24sub-certificates of registration, as applicable. With each 25such request, the applicant shall report the number of 26sub-certificates of registration he or she is requesting as   SB3628- 11 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1well as the total number of vending machines from which he or 2she makes retail sales. 3    Where the same person engages in 2 or more businesses of 4selling tangible personal property at retail in this State, 5which businesses are substantially different in character or 6engaged in under different trade names or engaged in under 7other substantially dissimilar circumstances (so that it is 8more practicable, from an accounting, auditing or bookkeeping 9standpoint, for such businesses to be separately registered), 10the Department may require or permit such person (subject to 11the same requirements concerning the furnishing of security as 12those that are provided for hereinbefore in this Section as to 13each application for a certificate of registration) to apply 14for and obtain a separate certificate of registration for each 15such business or for any of such businesses, under a single 16certificate of registration supplemented by related 17sub-certificates of registration.18    Any person who is registered under the Retailers' 19Occupation Tax Act as of March 8, 1963, and who, during the 203-year period immediately prior to March 8, 1963, or during a 21continuous 3-year period part of which passed immediately 22before and the remainder of which passes immediately after 23March 8, 1963, has been so registered continuously and who is 24determined by the Department not to have been either 25delinquent or deficient in the payment of tax liability during 26that period under this Act or under any other State tax law or   SB3628- 12 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1municipal or county tax ordinance or resolution under which 2the certificate of registration that is issued to the 3registrant under this Act will permit the registrant to engage 4in business without registering separately under such other 5law, ordinance or resolution, shall be considered to be a 6Prior Continuous Compliance taxpayer. Also any taxpayer who 7has, as verified by the Department, faithfully and 8continuously complied with the condition of his bond or other 9security under the provisions of this Act for a period of 3 10consecutive years shall be considered to be a Prior Continuous 11Compliance taxpayer.12    Every Prior Continuous Compliance taxpayer shall be exempt 13from all requirements under this Act concerning the furnishing 14of a bond or other security as a condition precedent to his 15being authorized to engage in the business of selling tangible 16personal property at retail in this State. This exemption 17shall continue for each such taxpayer until such time as he may 18be determined by the Department to be delinquent in the filing 19of any returns, or is determined by the Department (either 20through the Department's issuance of a final assessment which 21has become final under the Act, or by the taxpayer's filing of 22a return which admits tax that is not paid to be due) to be 23delinquent or deficient in the paying of any tax under this Act 24or under any other State tax law or municipal or county tax 25ordinance or resolution under which the certificate of 26registration that is issued to the registrant under this Act   SB3628- 13 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1will permit the registrant to engage in business without 2registering separately under such other law, ordinance or 3resolution, at which time that taxpayer shall become subject 4to all the financial responsibility requirements of this Act 5and, as a condition of being allowed to continue to engage in 6the business of selling tangible personal property at retail, 7may be required to post bond or other acceptable security with 8the Department covering liability which such taxpayer may 9thereafter incur. Any taxpayer who fails to pay an admitted or 10established liability under this Act may also be required to 11post bond or other acceptable security with this Department 12guaranteeing the payment of such admitted or established 13liability.14    No certificate of registration shall be issued to any 15person who is in default to the State of Illinois for moneys 16due under this Act or under any other State tax law or 17municipal or county tax ordinance or resolution under which 18the certificate of registration that is issued to the 19applicant under this Act will permit the applicant to engage 20in business without registering separately under such other 21law, ordinance or resolution.22    Any person aggrieved by any decision of the Department 23under this Section may, within 20 days after notice of such 24decision, protest and request a hearing, whereupon the 25Department shall give notice to such person of the time and 26place fixed for such hearing and shall hold a hearing in   SB3628- 14 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1conformity with the provisions of this Act and then issue its 2final administrative decision in the matter to such person. In 3the absence of such a protest within 20 days, the Department's 4decision shall become final without any further determination 5being made or notice given.6    With respect to security other than bonds (upon which the 7Department may sue in the event of a forfeiture), if the 8taxpayer fails to pay, when due, any amount whose payment such 9security guarantees, the Department shall, after such 10liability is admitted by the taxpayer or established by the 11Department through the issuance of a final assessment that has 12become final under the law, convert the security which that 13taxpayer has furnished into money for the State, after first 14giving the taxpayer at least 10 days' written notice, by 15registered or certified mail, to pay the liability or forfeit 16such security to the Department. If the security consists of 17stocks or bonds or other securities which are listed on a 18public exchange, the Department shall sell such securities 19through such public exchange. If the security consists of an 20irrevocable bank letter of credit, the Department shall 21convert the security in the manner provided for in the Uniform 22Commercial Code. If the security consists of a bank 23certificate of deposit, the Department shall convert the 24security into money by demanding and collecting the amount of 25such bank certificate of deposit from the bank which issued 26such certificate. If the security consists of a type of stocks   SB3628- 15 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1or other securities which are not listed on a public exchange, 2the Department shall sell such security to the highest and 3best bidder after giving at least 10 days' notice of the date, 4time and place of the intended sale by publication in the 5"State Official Newspaper". If the Department realizes more 6than the amount of such liability from the security, plus the 7expenses incurred by the Department in converting the security 8into money, the Department shall pay such excess to the 9taxpayer who furnished such security, and the balance shall be 10paid into the State Treasury.11    The Department shall discharge any surety and shall 12release and return any security deposited, assigned, pledged 13or otherwise provided to it by a taxpayer under this Section 14within 30 days after:15        (1) such taxpayer becomes a Prior Continuous 16    Compliance taxpayer; or17        (2) such taxpayer has ceased to collect receipts on 18    which he is required to remit tax to the Department, has 19    filed a final tax return, and has paid to the Department an 20    amount sufficient to discharge his remaining tax 21    liability, as determined by the Department, under this Act 22    and under every other State tax law or municipal or county 23    tax ordinance or resolution under which the certificate of 24    registration issued under this Act permits the registrant 25    to engage in business without registering separately under 26    such other law, ordinance or resolution. The Department   SB3628- 16 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1    shall make a final determination of the taxpayer's 2    outstanding tax liability as expeditiously as possible 3    after his final tax return has been filed; if the 4    Department cannot make such final determination within 45 5    days after receiving the final tax return, within such 6    period it shall so notify the taxpayer, stating its 7    reasons therefor.8(Source: P.A. 103-319, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 9104-6, eff. 6-16-25.) 10    (35 ILCS 120/2b)  (from Ch. 120, par. 441b)11    Sec. 2b. The Department may, after notice and a hearing as 12provided herein, revoke the certificate of registration of any 13person who violates any of the provisions of this Act. Before 14revocation of a certificate of registration the Department 15shall, within 90 days after non-compliance and at least 7 days 16prior to the date of the hearing, give the person so accused 17notice in writing of the charge against him or her, and on the 18date designated shall conduct a hearing upon this matter. The 19lapse of such 90 day period shall not preclude the Department 20from conducting revocation proceedings at a later date if 21necessary. Any hearing held under this Section shall be 22conducted by the Director of Revenue or by any officer or 23employee of the Department designated, in writing, by the 24Director of Revenue.25    Upon the hearing of any such proceeding, the Director of   SB3628- 17 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1Revenue, or any officer or employee of the Department 2designated, in writing, by the Director of Revenue, may 3administer oaths and the Department may procure by its 4subpoena the attendance of witnesses and, by its subpoena 5duces tecum, the production of relevant books and papers. Any 6circuit court, upon application either of the accused or of 7the Department, may, by order duly entered, require the 8attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant books 9and papers, before the Department in any hearing relating to 10the revocation of certificates of registration. Upon refusal 11or neglect to obey the order of the court, the court may compel 12obedience thereof by proceedings for contempt.13    The Department may, by application to any circuit court, 14obtain an injunction restraining any person who engages in the 15business of selling tangible personal property at retail in 16this State without a certificate of registration (either 17because the certificate of registration has been revoked or 18because of a failure to obtain a certificate of registration 19in the first instance) from engaging in such business until 20such person, as if he or she were a new applicant for a 21certificate of registration, shall comply with all of the 22conditions, restrictions and requirements of Section 2a of 23this Act and qualify for and obtain a certificate of 24registration. Upon refusal or neglect to obey the order of the 25court, the court may compel obedience thereof by proceedings 26for contempt.  SB3628- 18 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1    It shall not be a defense in a proceeding before the 2Department to revoke a certificate of registration issued 3under the Act, or in any action by the Department to collect 4any tax due under this Act, that the holder of the certificate 5is a party to an installment payment agreement under Section 62a of this Act if the liability which is the basis of the 7revocation proceeding, or the tax that is sought to be 8collected: (1) was incurred after the date of the agreement 9was approved by the Department; or (2) was incurred prior to 10the date the agreement was approved by the Department, but was 11not included in the agreement; or (3) was included in the 12agreement, but the taxpayer is in default of the agreement.13    If a person who is licensed as a retailer of alcoholic 14liquor under the Liquor Control Act of 1934 has had his or her 15certificate of registration revoked under this Section 2b, 16then, pursuant to Section 7-6.5 of the Liquor Control Act of 171934, the Department shall file a notice with the Liquor 18Control Commission that includes a certification, signed by 19its Director of Revenue or his or her designee, attesting that 20the person's certificate of registration has been revoked, 21after notice and an opportunity to be heard. 22(Source: P.A. 86-338; 86-383; 86-1028.) 23    Section 10. The Liquor Control Act of 1934 is amended by 24adding Sections 1-3.47 and 7-6.5 as follows:   SB3628- 19 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1    (235 ILCS 5/1-3.47 new)2    Sec. 1-3.47. Inactive license. "Inactive license" means a 3status of licensure in which the licensee holds a current 4license under this Act, but the licensee is prohibited from 5engaging in all licensed activities because the licensee does 6not hold an active certificate of registration issued by the 7Department of Revenue pursuant to the Retailers' Occupation 8Tax Act. 9    (235 ILCS 5/7-6.5 new)10    Sec. 7-6.5. Inactive licenses; certificate of 11registration. Notwithstanding anything in this Act to the 12contrary, the Commission shall inactivate the license of any 13licensee authorized to sell alcoholic liquor at retail if that 14person's certificate of registration renewal has been denied 15by the Department of Revenue pursuant to Section 2a of the 16Retailers' Occupation Tax Act or that person's certificate of 17registration has been revoked by the Department of Revenue 18pursuant to Section 2b of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act 19until the violation resulting in the nonrenewal or revocation 20has been remedied and the certificate of registration has been 21reinstated by the Department of Revenue. The Department of 22Revenue shall file a notice with the Commission that includes 23a certification, signed by Director of Revenue or his or her 24designee, attesting that the person's certificate of 25registration renewal has been denied or the person's   SB3628- 20 -LRB104 16367 HLH 29754 b1certificate of registration has been revoked after notice and 2an opportunity to be heard.3    If a person who is licensed as a retailer of alcoholic 4liquor under this Act has had the renewal of his or her 5certificate of registration denied under Section 2a or revoked 6under Section 2b of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, then, 7pursuant to this Section, distributors licensed under this Act 8are prohibited from selling alcoholic liquor to that retailer, 9that retailer is prohibited from purchasing alcoholic liquor 10from distributors, and all other licensed activities are 11prohibited pending notification by the Department of Revenue 12that the nonrenewal or revocation has been resolved to the 13Department of Revenue's satisfaction.  14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 152026.